incubator/apertium-pl-cs.cs.dix
    <pardef n="sv/ůj__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ůj</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ůj</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oja</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ého</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ého</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojí</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ého</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ému</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ému</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojí</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ému</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
         <p>
          <l>ého</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ůj</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
         <p>
          <l>oji</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e r="LR">
         <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e>
         <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e r="LR">
         <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ým</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ým</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
         <p>
          <l>ojí</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e r="LR">
         <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
     </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ým</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ém</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ém</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojí</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ým</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ůj</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ůj</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plurals -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oji</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ých</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ých</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ých</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ých</l>
          <r>ůj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ým</l>

    <e lm="svůj"><i>sv</i><par n="sv/ůj__det"/></e>
